California, session 20252026, AB608.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 30511 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30511. Local A local coastal programs program shall be submitted in accordance with the schedule established pursuant to Section 30517.5. At the option of the local government, this the local coastal program may be submitted and processed in any of the following ways:(a) At one time, in which event Section 30512 with respect to time limits, resubmission, approval, and certification shall apply. However, the zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, and, if required, other implementing actions included in the local coastal program shall be approved and certified pursuant to the standards of Section 30513.(b) In two phases, in which event the land use plans shall be processed first pursuant to Section 30512, and the zoning ordinances, zoning district maps, and, if required, other implementing actions, shall be processed thereafter pursuant to Section 30513.(c) In separate geographic units consisting of less than the local government’s jurisdiction lying within the coastal zone, each submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), if the commission finds that the area or areas proposed for separate review can be analyzed for the potential cumulative impacts of development on coastal resources and access independently of the remainder of the affected jurisdiction.